Arkansas, session 2025, HB1712.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 17, Chapter 103, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 4 — Social Work Licensure Compact

17-103-401. Text of compact.
The Social Work Licensure Compact is enacted into law and entered into
by this state with all states legally joining therein and in the form
substantially as follows:

SOCIAL WORK LICENSURE COMPACT

SECTION 1: PURPOSE
The purpose of this Compact is to facilitate interstate practice of
Regulated Social Workers by improving public access to competent Social Work
Services. The Compact preserves the regulatory authority of States to protect
public health and safety through the current system of State licensure.
This Compact is designed to achieve the following objectives:
A. Increase public access to Social Work Services;
*JMB393*
03/07/2025 3:25:10 PM JMB393

HB1712
B. Reduce overly burdensome and duplicative requirements associated
with holding multiple licenses;
C. Enhance the Member States’ ability to protect the public’s health
and safety;
D. Encourage the cooperation of Member States in regulating multistate
practice;
E. Promote mobility and address workforce shortages by eliminating the
necessity for licenses in multiple States by providing for the mutual
recognition of other Member State licenses;
F. Support military families;
G. Facilitate the exchange of licensure and disciplinary information
among Member States;
H. Authorize all Member States to hold a Regulated Social Worker
accountable for abiding by a Member State’s laws, regulations, and applicable
professional standards in the Member State in which the client is located at
the time care is rendered; and
I. Allow for the use of telehealth to facilitate increased access to
regulated Social Work Services.

SECTION 2. DEFINITIONS
As used in this Compact, and except as otherwise provided, the
following definitions shall apply:
A. “Active Military Member” means any individual with full-time duty
status in the active armed forces of the United States including members of
the National Guard and Reserve.
B. “Adverse Action” means any administrative, civil, equitable or
criminal action permitted by a State’s laws which is imposed by a Licensing
Authority or other authority against a Regulated Social Worker, including
actions against an individual’s license or Multistate Authorization to
Practice such as revocation, suspension, probation, monitoring of the
Licensee, limitation on the Licensee’s practice, or any other Encumbrance on
licensure affecting a Regulated Social Worker’s authorization to practice,
including issuance of a cease and desist action.
C. “Alternative Program” means a non-disciplinary monitoring or
practice remediation process approved by a Licensing Authority to address
practitioners with an Impairment.
03/07/2025 3:25:10 PM JMB393

HB1712
D. “Charter Member States” - Member States who have enacted
legislation to adopt this Compact where such legislation predates the
effective date of this Compact as described in Section 14.
E. “Compact Commission” or “Commission” means the government agency
whose membership consists of all States that have enacted this Compact, which
is known as the Social Work Licensure Compact Commission, as described in
Section 10, and which shall operate as an instrumentality of the Member
States.
F. “Current Significant Investigative Information” means:
1. Investigative information that a Licensing Authority, after a
preliminary inquiry that includes notification and an opportunity for the
Regulated Social Worker to respond has reason to believe is not groundless
and, if proved true, would indicate more than a minor infraction as may be
defined by the Commission; or
2. Investigative information that indicates that the Regulated
Social Worker represents an immediate threat to public health and safety, as
may be defined by the Commission, regardless of whether the Regulated Social
Worker has been notified and has had an opportunity to respond.
G. “Data System” means a repository of information about Licensees,
including, continuing education, examination, licensure, Current Significant
Investigative Information, Disqualifying Event, Multistate License(s) and
Adverse Action information or other information as required by the
Commission.
H. “Disqualifying Event” means any Adverse Action or incident which
results in an Encumbrance that disqualifies or makes the Licensee ineligible
to either obtain, retain or renew a Multistate License.
I. “Domicile” means the jurisdiction in which the Licensee resides and
intends to remain indefinitely.
J. “Encumbrance” means a revocation or suspension of, or any
limitation on, the full and unrestricted practice of Social Work licensed and
regulated by a Licensing Authority.
K. “Executive Committee” means a group of delegates elected or
appointed to act on behalf of, and within the powers granted to them by, the
compact and Commission.
L. “Home State” means the Member State that is the Licensee’s primary
Domicile.
03/07/2025 3:25:10 PM JMB393

HB1712
M. “Impairment” means a condition(s) that may impair a practitioner’s
ability to engage in full and unrestricted practice as a Regulated Social
Worker without some type of intervention and may include alcohol and drug
dependence, mental health impairment, and neurological or physical
impairments.
N. “Licensee(s)” means an individual who currently holds a license
from a State to practice as a Regulated Social Worker.
O. “Licensing Authority” means the board or agency of a Member State,
or equivalent, that is responsible for the licensing and regulation of
Regulated Social Workers.
P. “Member State” means a state, commonwealth, district, or territory
of the United States of America that has enacted this Compact.
Q. “Multistate Authorization to Practice” means a legally authorized
privilege to practice, which is equivalent to a license, associated with a
Multistate License permitting the practice of Social Work in a Remote State.
R. “Multistate License” means a license to practice as a Regulated
Social Worker issued by a Home State Licensing Authority that authorizes the
Regulated Social Worker to practice in all Member States under Multistate
Authorization to Practice.
S. “Qualifying National Exam” means a national licensing examination
approved by the Commission.
T. “Regulated Social Worker” means any clinical, master’s or
bachelor’s Social Worker licensed by a Member State regardless of the title
used by that Member State.
U. “Remote State” means a Member State other than the Licensee’s Home
State.
V. “Rule(s)” or “Rule(s) of the Commission” means a regulation or
regulations duly promulgated by the Commission, as authorized by the Compact,
that has the force of law.
W. “Single State License” means a Social Work license issued by any
State that authorizes practice only within the issuing State and does not
include Multistate Authorization to Practice in any Member State.
X. “Social Work” or “Social Work Services” means the application of
social work theory, knowledge, methods, ethics, and the professional use of
self to restore or enhance social, psychosocial, or biopsychosocial
functioning of individuals, couples, families, groups, organizations, and
03/07/2025 3:25:10 PM JMB393

HB1712
communities through the care and services provided by a Regulated Social
Worker as set forth in the Member State’s statutes and regulations in the
State where the services are being provided.
Y. “State” means any state, commonwealth, district, or territory of
the United States of America that regulates the practice of Social Work.
Z. “Unencumbered License” means a license that authorizes a Regulated
Social Worker to engage in the full and unrestricted practice of Social Work.

SECTION 3. STATE PARTICIPATION IN THE COMPACT
A. To be eligible to participate in the compact, a potential Member
State must currently meet all of the following criteria:
1. License and regulate the practice of Social Work at either
the clinical, master’s, or bachelor’s category.
2. Require applicants for licensure to graduate from a program
that is:
a. Operated by a college or university recognized by the
Licensing Authority;
b. Accredited, or in candidacy by an institution that
subsequently becomes accredited, by an accrediting agency recognized by
either:
i. the Council for Higher Education Accreditation,
or its successor; or
ii. the United States Department of Education; and
c. Corresponds to the licensure sought as outlined in
Section 4.
3. Require applicants for clinical licensure to complete a
period of supervised practice.
4. Have a mechanism in place for receiving, investigating, and
adjudicating complaints about Licensees.
B. To maintain membership in the Compact a Member State shall:
1. Require that applicants for a Multistate License pass a
Qualifying National Exam for the corresponding category of Multistate License
sought as outlined in Section 4.
2. Participate fully in the Commission’s Data System, including
using the Commission’s unique identifier as defined in Rules;
3. Notify the Commission, in compliance with the terms of the
03/07/2025 3:25:10 PM JMB393

HB1712
Compact and Rules, of any Adverse Action or the availability of Current
Significant Investigative Information regarding a Licensee;
4. Implement procedures for considering the criminal history
records of applicants for a Multistate License. Such procedures shall include
the submission of fingerprints or other biometric-based information by
applicants for the purpose of obtaining an applicant’s criminal history
record information from the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the agency
responsible for retaining that State’s criminal records.
5. Comply with the Rules of the Commission;
6. Require an applicant to obtain or retain a license in the
Home State and meet the Home State’s qualifications for licensure or renewal
of licensure, as well as all other applicable Home State laws;
7. Authorize a Licensee holding a Multistate License in any
Member State to practice in accordance with the terms of the Compact and
Rules of the Commission; and
8. Designate a delegate to participate in the Commission
meetings.
C. A Member State meeting the requirements of Section 3.A. and 3.B. of
this Compact shall designate the categories of Social Work licensure that are
eligible for issuance of a Multistate License for applicants in such Member
State. To the extent that any Member State does not meet the requirements for
participation in the Compact at any particular category of Social Work
licensure, such Member State may choose, but is not obligated to, issue a
Multistate License to applicants that otherwise meet the requirements of
Section 4 for issuance of a Multistate License in such category or categories
of licensure.
D. The Home State may charge a fee for granting the Multistate
License.

SECTION 4. SOCIAL WORKER PARTICIPATION IN THE COMPACT
A. To be eligible for a Multistate License under the terms and
provisions of the Compact, an applicant, regardless of category must:
1. Hold or be eligible for an active, Unencumbered License in
the Home State;
2. Pay any applicable fees, including any State fee, for the
Multistate License;
03/07/2025 3:25:10 PM JMB393

HB1712
3. Submit, in connection with an application for a Multistate
License, fingerprints or other biometric data for the purpose of obtaining
criminal history record information from the Federal Bureau of Investigation
and the agency responsible for retaining that State’s criminal records.
4. Notify the Home State of any Adverse Action, Encumbrance, or
restriction on any professional license taken by any Member State or non-
Member State within 30 days from the date the action is taken.
5. Meet any continuing competence requirements established by
the Home State;
6. Abide by the laws, regulations, and applicable standards in
the Member State where the client is located at the time care is rendered.
B. An applicant for a clinical-category Multistate License must meet
all of the following requirements:
2. Fulfill a competency requirement, which shall be satisfied by
either:
a. Passage of a clinical-category Qualifying National
Exam; or
b. Licensure of the applicant in their Home State at the
clinical category, beginning prior to such time as a Qualifying National Exam
was required by the Home State and accompanied by a period of continuous
Social Work licensure thereafter, all of which may be further governed by the
Rules of the Commission; or
c. The substantial equivalency of the foregoing competency
requirements which the Commission may determine by Rule.
3. Attain at least a master’s degree in Social Work from a
program that is:
a. Operated by a college or university recognized by the
Licensing Authority; and
b. Accredited, or in candidacy that subsequently becomes
accredited, by an accrediting agency recognized by either:
i. the Council for Higher Education Accreditation or
its successor; or
ii. the United States Department of Education.
4. Fulfill a practice requirement, which shall be satisfied by
demonstrating completion of either:
a. A period of postgraduate supervised clinical practice
03/07/2025 3:25:10 PM JMB393

HB1712
equal to a minimum of three thousand hours; or
b. A minimum of two years of full-time postgraduate
supervised clinical practice; or
c. The substantial equivalency of the foregoing practice
requirements which the Commission may determine by Rule.
C. An applicant for a master’s-category Multistate License must meet
all of the following requirements:
1. Fulfill a competency requirement, which shall be satisfied by
either:
a. Passage of a master's-category Qualifying National
Exam;
b. Licensure of the applicant in their Home State at the
master’s category, beginning prior to such time as a Qualifying National Exam
was required by the Home State at the master’s category and accompanied by a
continuous period of Social Work licensure thereafter, all of which may be
further governed by the Rules of the Commission; or
c. The substantial equivalency of the foregoing competency
requirements which the Commission may determine by Rule.
2. Attain at least a master’s degree in Social Work from a
program that is:
a. Operated by a college or university recognized by the
Licensing Authority; and
b. Accredited, or in candidacy that subsequently becomes
accredited, by an accrediting agency recognized by either:
i. the Council for Higher Education Accreditation or
its successor; or
ii. the United States Department of Education.
D. An applicant for a bachelor’s-category Multistate License must meet
all of the following requirements:
1. Fulfill a competency requirement, which shall be satisfied by
either:
a. Passage of a bachelor’s-category Qualifying National
Exam;
b. Licensure of the applicant in their Home State at the
bachelor’s category, beginning prior to such time as a Qualifying National
Exam was required by the Home State and accompanied by a period of continuous
03/07/2025 3:25:10 PM JMB393

HB1712
Social Work licensure thereafter, all of which may be further governed by the
Rules of the Commission; or
c. The substantial equivalency of the foregoing competency
requirements which the Commission may determine by Rule.
2. Attain at least a bachelor’s degree in Social Work from a
program that is:
a. Operated by a college or university recognized by the
Licensing Authority; and
b. Accredited, or in candidacy that subsequently becomes
accredited, by an accrediting agency recognized by either:
i. the Council for Higher Education Accreditation or
its successor; or
ii. the United States Department of Education.
E. The Multistate License for a Regulated Social Worker is subject to
the renewal requirements of the Home State. The Regulated Social Worker must
maintain compliance with the requirements of Section 4.A. to be eligible to
renew a Multistate License.
F. The Regulated Social Worker’s services in a Remote State are
subject to that Member State’s regulatory authority. A Remote State may, in
accordance with due process and that Member State’s laws, remove a Regulated
Social Worker’s Multistate Authorization to Practice in the Remote State for
a specific period of time, impose fines, and take any other necessary actions
to protect the health and safety of its citizens.
G. If a Multistate License is encumbered, the Regulated Social
Worker’s Multistate Authorization to Practice shall be deactivated in all
Remote States until the Multistate License is no longer encumbered.
H. If a Multistate Authorization to Practice is encumbered in a Remote
State, the regulated Social Worker’s Multistate Authorization to Practice may
be deactivated in that State until the Multistate Authorization to Practice
is no longer encumbered.

SECTION 5: ISSUANCE OF A MULTISTATE LICENSE
A. Upon receipt of an application for Multistate License, the Home
State Licensing Authority shall determine the applicant’s eligibility for a
Multistate License in accordance with Section 4 of this Compact.
B. If such applicant is eligible pursuant to Section 4 of this
03/07/2025 3:25:10 PM JMB393

HB1712
Compact, the Home State Licensing Authority shall issue a Multistate License
that authorizes the applicant or Regulated Social Worker to practice in all
Member States under a Multistate Authorization to Practice.
C. Upon issuance of a Multistate License, the Home State Licensing
Authority shall designate whether the Regulated Social Worker holds a
Multistate License in the Bachelors, Masters, or Clinical category of Social
Work.
D. A Multistate License issued by a Home State to a resident in that
State shall be recognized by all Compact Member States as authorizing Social
Work Practice under a Multistate Authorization to Practice corresponding to
each category of licensure regulated in each Member State.

SECTION 6: AUTHORITY OF INTERSTATE COMPACT COMMISSION AND MEMBER STATE
LICENSING AUTHORITIES
A. Nothing in this Compact, nor any Rule of the Commission, shall be
construed to limit, restrict, or in any way reduce the ability of a Member
State to enact and enforce laws, regulations, or other rules related to the
practice of Social Work in that State, where those laws, regulations, or
other rules are not inconsistent with the provisions of this Compact.
B. Nothing in this Compact shall affect the requirements established
by a Member State for the issuance of a Single State License.
C. Nothing in this Compact, nor any Rule of the Commission, shall be
construed to limit, restrict, or in any way reduce the ability of a Member
State to take Adverse Action against a Licensee’s Single State License to
practice Social Work in that State.
D. Nothing in this Compact, nor any Rule of the Commission, shall be
construed to limit, restrict, or in any way reduce the ability of a Remote
State to take Adverse Action against a Licensee’s Multistate Authorization to
Practice in that State.
E. Nothing in this Compact, nor any Rule of the Commission, shall be
construed to limit, restrict, or in any way reduce the ability of a
Licensee’s Home State to take Adverse Action against a Licensee’s Multistate
License based upon information provided by a Remote State.

SECTION 7: REISSUANCE OF A MULTISTATE LICENSE BY A NEW HOME STATE
A. A Licensee can hold a Multistate License, issued by their Home
03/07/2025 3:25:10 PM JMB393

HB1712
State, in only one Member State at any given time.
B. If a Licensee changes their Home State by moving between two Member
States:
1. The Licensee shall immediately apply for the reissuance of
their Multistate License in their new Home State. The Licensee shall pay all
applicable fees and notify the prior Home State in accordance with the Rules
of the Commission.
2. Upon receipt of an application to reissue a Multistate
License, the new Home State shall verify that the Multistate License is
active, unencumbered and eligible for reissuance under the terms of the
Compact and the Rules of the Commission. The Multistate License issued by the
prior Home State will be deactivated and all Member States notified in
accordance with the applicable Rules adopted by the Commission.
3. Prior to the reissuance of the Multistate License, the new
Home State shall conduct procedures for considering the criminal history
records of the Licensee. Such procedures shall include the submission of
fingerprints or other biometric-based information by applicants for the
purpose of obtaining an applicant’s criminal history record information from
the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the agency responsible for retaining
that State’s criminal records.
4. If required for initial licensure, the new Home State may
require completion of jurisprudence requirements in the new Home State.
5. Notwithstanding any other provision of this Compact, if a
Licensee does not meet the requirements set forth in this Compact for the
reissuance of a Multistate License by the new Home State, then the Licensee
shall be subject to the new Home State requirements for the issuance of a
Single State License in that State.
C. If a Licensee changes their primary State of residence by moving
from a Member State to a non-Member State, or from a non-Member State to a
Member State, then the Licensee shall be subject to the State requirements
for the issuance of a Single State License in the new Home State.
D. Nothing in this Compact shall interfere with a Licensee’s ability
to hold a Single State License in multiple States; however, for the purposes
of this Compact, a Licensee shall have only one Home State, and only one
Multistate License.
E. Nothing in this Compact shall interfere with the requirements
03/07/2025 3:25:10 PM JMB393

HB1712
established by a Member State for the issuance of a Single State License.

SECTION 8. MILITARY FAMILIES
An Active Military Member or their spouse shall designate a Home State
where the individual has a Multistate License. The individual may retain
their Home State designation during the period the service member is on
active duty.

SECTION 9. ADVERSE ACTIONS
A. In addition to the other powers conferred by State law, a Remote
State shall have the authority, in accordance with existing State due process
law, to:
1. Take Adverse Action against a Regulated Social Worker’s
Multistate Authorization to Practice only within that Member State, and issue
subpoenas for both hearings and investigations that require the attendance
and testimony of witnesses as well as the production of evidence. Subpoenas
issued by a Licensing Authority in a Member State for the attendance and
testimony of witnesses or the production of evidence from another Member
State shall be enforced in the latter State by any court of competent
jurisdiction, according to the practice and procedure of that court
applicable to subpoenas issued in proceedings pending before it. The issuing
Licensing Authority shall pay any witness fees, travel expenses, mileage, and
other fees required by the service statutes of the State in which the
witnesses or evidence are located.
2. Only the Home State shall have the power to take Adverse
Action against a Regulated Social Worker’s Multistate License.
B. For purposes of taking Adverse Action, the Home State shall give
the same priority and effect to reported conduct received from a Member State
as it would if the conduct had occurred within the Home State. In so doing,
the Home State shall apply its own State laws to determine appropriate
action.
C. The Home State shall complete any pending investigations of a
Regulated Social Worker who changes their Home State during the course of the
investigations. The Home State shall also have the authority to take
appropriate action(s) and shall promptly report the conclusions of the
investigations to the administrator of the Data System. The administrator of
03/07/2025 3:25:10 PM JMB393

HB1712
the Data System shall promptly notify the new Home State of any Adverse
Actions.
D. A Member State, if otherwise permitted by State law, may recover
from the affected Regulated Social Worker the costs of investigations and
dispositions of cases resulting from any Adverse Action taken against that
Regulated Social Worker.
E. A Member State may take Adverse Action based on the factual
findings of another Member State, provided that the Member State follows its
own procedures for taking the Adverse Action.
F. Joint Investigations:
1. In addition to the authority granted to a Member State by its
respective Social Work practice act or other applicable State law, any Member
State may participate with other Member States in joint investigations of
Licensees.
2. Member States shall share any investigative, litigation, or
compliance materials in furtherance of any joint or individual investigation
initiated under the Compact.
G. If Adverse Action is taken by the Home State against the Multistate
License of a Regulated Social Worker, the Regulated Social Worker’s
Multistate Authorization to Practice in all other Member States shall be
deactivated until all Encumbrances have been removed from the Multistate
License. All Home State disciplinary orders that impose Adverse Action
against the license of a Regulated Social Worker shall include a statement
that the Regulated Social Worker’s Multistate Authorization to Practice is
deactivated in all Member States until all conditions of the decision, order
or agreement are satisfied.
H. If a Member State takes Adverse Action, it shall promptly notify
the administrator of the Data System. The administrator of the Data System
shall promptly notify the Home State and all other Member State’s of any
Adverse Actions by Remote States.
I. Nothing in this Compact shall override a Member State’s decision
that participation in an Alternative Program may be used in lieu of Adverse
Action.
J. Nothing in this Compact shall authorize a Member State to demand
the issuance of subpoenas for attendance and testimony of witnesses or the
production of evidence from another Member State for lawful actions within
03/07/2025 3:25:10 PM JMB393

HB1712
that Member State.
K. Nothing in this Compact shall authorize a Member State to impose
discipline against a Regulated Social Worker who holds a Multistate
Authorization to Practice for lawful actions within another Member State.

SECTION 10. ESTABLISHMENT OF SOCIAL WORK LICENSURE COMPACT COMMISSION
A. The Compact Member States hereby create and establish a joint
government agency whose membership consists of all Member States that have
enacted the compact known as the Social Work Licensure Compact Commission.
The Commission is an instrumentality of the Compact States acting jointly and
not an instrumentality of any one State. The Commission shall come into
existence on or after the effective date of the Compact as set forth in
Section 14.
B. Membership, Voting, and Meetings
1. Each Member State shall have and be limited to one (1)
delegate selected by that Member State’s State Licensing Authority.
2. The delegate shall be either:
a. A current member of the State Licensing Authority at
the time of appointment, who is a Regulated Social Worker or public member of
the State Licensing Authority; or
b. An administrator of the State Licensing Authority or
their designee.
3. The Commission shall by Rule or bylaw establish a term of
office for delegates and may by Rule or bylaw establish term limits.
4. The Commission may recommend removal or suspension of any
delegate from office.
5. A Member State’s State Licensing Authority shall fill any
vacancy of its delegate occurring on the Commission within 60 days of the
vacancy.
6. Each delegate shall be entitled to one vote on all matters
before the Commission requiring a vote by Commission delegates.
7. A delegate shall vote in person or by such other means as
provided in the bylaws. The bylaws may provide for delegates to meet by
telecommunication, videoconference, or other means of communication.
8. The Commission shall meet at least once during each calendar
year. Additional meetings may be held as set forth in the bylaws. The
03/07/2025 3:25:10 PM JMB393

HB1712
Commission may meet by telecommunication, video conference or other similar
electronic means.
C. The Commission shall have the following powers:
1. Establish the fiscal year of the Commission;
2. Establish code of conduct and conflict of interest policies;
3. Establish and amend Rules and bylaws;
4. Maintain its financial records in accordance with the bylaws;
5. Meet and take such actions as are consistent with the
provisions of this Compact, the Commission’s Rules, and the bylaws;
6. Initiate and conclude legal proceedings or actions in the
name of the Commission, provided that the standing of any State Licensing
Board to sue or be sued under applicable law shall not be affected;
7. Maintain and certify records and information provided to a
Member State as the authenticated business records of the Commission, and
designate an agent to do so on the Commission's behalf;
8. Purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;
9. Borrow, accept, or contract for services of personnel,
including, but not limited to, employees of a Member State;
10. Conduct an annual financial review;
11. Hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix compensation,
define duties, grant such individuals appropriate authority to carry out the
purposes of the Compact, and establish the Commission’s personnel policies
and programs relating to conflicts of interest, qualifications of personnel,
and other related personnel matters;
12. Assess and collect fees;
13. Accept any and all appropriate gifts, donations, grants of
money, other sources of revenue, equipment, supplies, materials, and
services, and receive, utilize, and dispose of the same; provided that at all
times the Commission shall avoid any appearance of impropriety or conflict of
interest;
14. Lease, purchase, retain, own, hold, improve, or use any
property, real, personal, or mixed, or any undivided interest therein;
15. Sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon, or
otherwise dispose of any property real, personal, or mixed;
16. Establish a budget and make expenditures;
17. Borrow money;
03/07/2025 3:25:10 PM JMB393

HB1712
18. Appoint committees, including standing committees, composed
of members, State regulators, State legislators or their representatives, and
consumer representatives, and such other interested persons as may be
designated in this Compact and the bylaws;
19. Provide and receive information from, and cooperate with,
law enforcement agencies;
20. Establish and elect an Executive Committee, including a
chair and a vice chair;
21. Determine whether a State’s adopted language is materially
different from the model compact language such that the State would not
qualify for participation in the Compact; and
22. Perform such other functions as may be necessary or
appropriate to achieve the purposes of this Compact.
D. The Executive Committee
1. The Executive Committee shall have the power to act on behalf
of the Commission according to the terms of this Compact. The powers, duties,
and responsibilities of the Executive Committee shall include:
a. Oversee the day-to-day activities of the administration
of the compact including enforcement and compliance with the provisions of
the compact, its Rules and bylaws, and other such duties as deemed necessary;
b. Recommend to the Commission changes to the Rules or
bylaws, changes to this Compact legislation, fees charged to Compact Member
States, fees charged to Licensees, and other fees;
c. Ensure Compact administration services are
appropriately provided, including by contract;
d. Prepare and recommend the budget;
e. Maintain financial records on behalf of the Commission;
f. Monitor Compact compliance of Member States and provide
compliance reports to the Commission;
g. Establish additional committees as necessary;
h. Exercise the powers and duties of the Commission during
the interim between Commission meetings, except for adopting or amending
Rules, adopting or amending bylaws, and exercising any other powers and
duties expressly reserved to the Commission by Rule or bylaw; and
i. Other duties as provided in the Rules or bylaws of the
Commission.
03/07/2025 3:25:10 PM JMB393

HB1712
2. The Executive Committee shall be composed of up to eleven
(11) members:
a. The chair and vice chair of the Commission shall be
voting members of the Executive Committee; and
b. The Commission shall elect five voting members from the
current membership of the Commission.
c. Up to four (4) ex-officio, nonvoting members from four
(4) recognized national Social Work organizations.
d. The ex-officio members will be selected by their
respective organizations.
3. The Commission may remove any member of the Executive
Committee as provided in the Commission’s bylaws.
4. The Executive Committee shall meet at least annually.
a. Executive Committee meetings shall be open to the
public, except that the Executive Committee may meet in a closed, non-public
meeting as provided in subsection F.2. below.
b. The Executive Committee shall give seven (7) days’
notice of its meetings, posted on its website and as determined to provide
notice to persons with an interest in the business of the Commission.
c. The Executive Committee may hold a special meeting in
accordance with subsection F.1.b. below.
E. The Commission shall adopt and provide to the Member States an
annual report.
F. Meetings of the Commission
1. All meetings shall be open to the public, except that the
Commission may meet in a closed, non-public meeting as provided in subsection
F.2. below.
a. Public notice for all meetings of the full Commission
of meetings shall be given in the same manner as required under the
Rulemaking provisions in Section 12, except that the Commission may hold a
special meeting as provided in subsection F.1.b. below.
b. The Commission may hold a special meeting when it must
meet to conduct emergency business by giving 48 hours’ notice to all
commissioners, on the Commission’s website, and other means as provided in
the Commission’s Rules. The Commission’s legal counsel shall certify that the
Commission’s need to meet qualifies as an emergency.
03/07/2025 3:25:10 PM JMB393

HB1712
2. The Commission or the Executive Committee or other committees
of the Commission may convene in a closed, non-public meeting for the
Commission or Executive Committee or other committees of the Commission to
receive legal advice or to discuss:
a. Non-compliance of a Member State with its obligations
under the Compact;
b. The employment, compensation, discipline or other
matters, practices or procedures related to specific employees;
c. Current or threatened discipline of a Licensee by the
Commission or by a Member State’s Licensing Authority;
d. Current, threatened, or reasonably anticipated
litigation;
e. Negotiation of contracts for the purchase, lease, or
sale of goods, services, or real estate;
f. Accusing any person of a crime or formally censuring
any person;
g. Trade secrets or commercial or financial information
that is privileged or confidential;
h. Information of a personal nature where disclosure would
constitute a clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy;
i. Investigative records compiled for law enforcement
purposes;
j. Information related to any investigative reports
prepared by or on behalf of or for use of the Commission or other committee
charged with responsibility of investigation or determination of compliance
issues pursuant to the Compact;
k. Matters specifically exempted from disclosure by
federal or Member State law; or
l. Other matters as promulgated by the Commission by Rule.
3. If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed, the
presiding officer shall state that the meeting will be closed and reference
each relevant exempting provision, and such reference shall be recorded in
the minutes.
4. The Commission shall keep minutes that fully and clearly
describe all matters discussed in a meeting and shall provide a full and
accurate summary of actions taken, and the reasons therefore, including a
03/07/2025 3:25:10 PM JMB393

HB1712
description of the views expressed. All documents considered in connection
with an action shall be identified in such minutes. All minutes and documents
of a closed meeting shall remain under seal, subject to release only by a
majority vote of the Commission or order of a court of competent
jurisdiction.
G. Financing of the Commission
1. The Commission shall pay, or provide for the payment of, the
reasonable expenses of its establishment, organization, and ongoing
activities.
2. The Commission may accept any and all appropriate revenue
sources as provided in subsection C.13.
3. The Commission may levy on and collect an annual assessment
from each Member State and impose fees on Licensees of Member States to whom
it grants a Multistate License to cover the cost of the operations and
activities of the Commission and its staff, which must be in a total amount
sufficient to cover its annual budget as approved each year for which revenue
is not provided by other sources. The aggregate annual assessment amount for
Member States shall be allocated based upon a formula that the Commission
shall promulgate by Rule.
4. The Commission shall not incur obligations of any kind prior
to securing the funds adequate to meet the same; nor shall the Commission
pledge the credit of any of the Member States, except by and with the
authority of the Member State.
5. The Commission shall keep accurate accounts of all receipts
and disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of the Commission shall be
subject to the financial review and accounting procedures established under
its bylaws. However, all receipts and disbursements of funds handled by the
Commission shall be subject to an annual financial review by a certified or
licensed public accountant, and the report of the financial review shall be
included in and become part of the annual report of the Commission.
H. Qualified Immunity, Defense, and Indemnification
1. The members, officers, executive director, employees and
representatives of the Commission shall be immune from suit and liability,
both personally and in their official capacity, for any claim for damage to
or loss of property or personal injury or other civil liability caused by or
arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred,
03/07/2025 3:25:10 PM JMB393

HB1712
or that the person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for
believing occurred within the scope of Commission employment, duties or
responsibilities; provided that nothing in this paragraph shall be construed
to protect any such person from suit or liability for any damage, loss,
injury, or liability caused by the intentional or willful or wanton
misconduct of that person. The procurement of insurance of any type by the
Commission shall not in any way compromise or limit the immunity granted
hereunder.
2. The Commission shall defend any member, officer, executive
director, employee, and representative of the Commission in any civil action
seeking to impose liability arising out of any actual or alleged act, error,
or omission that occurred within the scope of Commission employment, duties,
or responsibilities, or as determined by the Commission that the person
against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred
within the scope of Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities;
provided that nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit that person from
retaining their own counsel at their own expense; and provided further, that
the actual or alleged act, error, or omission did not result from that
person’s intentional or willful or wanton misconduct.
3. The Commission shall indemnify and hold harmless any member,
officer, executive director, employee, and representative of the Commission
for the amount of any settlement or judgment obtained against that person
arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred
within the scope of Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, or
that such person had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the
scope of Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, provided that
the actual or alleged act, error, or omission did not result from the
intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that person.
4. Nothing herein shall be construed as a limitation on the
liability of any Licensee for professional malpractice or misconduct, which
shall be governed solely by any other applicable State laws.
5. Nothing in this Compact shall be interpreted to waive or
otherwise abrogate a Member State’s state action immunity or state action
affirmative defense with respect to antitrust claims under the Sherman Act,
Clayton Act, or any other State or federal antitrust or anticompetitive law
or regulation.
03/07/2025 3:25:10 PM JMB393

HB1712
6. Nothing in this Compact shall be construed to be a waiver of
sovereign immunity by the Member States or by the Commission.

SECTION 11 . DATA SYSTEM
A. The Commission shall provide for the development, maintenance,
operation, and utilization of a coordinated Data System.
B. The Commission shall assign each applicant for a Multistate License
a unique identifier, as determined by the Rules of the Commission.
C. Notwithstanding any other provision of State law to the contrary, a
Member State shall submit a uniform data set to the Data System on all
individuals to whom this Compact is applicable as required by the Rules of
the Commission, including:
1. Identifying information;
2. Licensure data;
3. Adverse Actions against a license and information related
thereto;
4. Non-confidential information related to Alternative Program
participation, the beginning and ending dates of such participation, and
other information related to such participation not made confidential under
Member State law;
5. Any denial of application for licensure, and the reason(s)
for such denial;
6. The presence of Current Significant Investigative
Information; and
7. Other information that may facilitate the administration of
this Compact or the protection of the public, as determined by the Rules of
the Commission.
D. The records and information provided to a Member State pursuant to
this Compact or through the Data System, when certified by the Commission or
an agent thereof, shall constitute the authenticated business records of the
Commission, and shall be entitled to any associated hearsay exception in any
relevant judicial, quasi-judicial or administrative proceedings in a Member
State.
E. Current Significant Investigative Information pertaining to a
Licensee in any Member State will only be available to other Member States.
1. It is the responsibility of the Member States to report any
03/07/2025 3:25:10 PM JMB393

HB1712
Adverse Action against a Licensee and to monitor the database to determine
whether Adverse Action has been taken against a Licensee. Adverse Action
information pertaining to a Licensee in any Member State will be available to
any other Member State.
F. Member States contributing information to the Data System may
designate information that may not be shared with the public without the
express permission of the contributing State.
G. Any information submitted to the Data System that is subsequently
expunged pursuant to federal law or the laws of the Member State contributing
the information shall be removed from the Data System.

SECTION 12. RULEMAKING
A. The Commission shall promulgate reasonable Rules in order to
effectively and efficiently implement and administer the purposes and
provisions of the Compact. A Rule shall be invalid and have no force or
effect only if a court of competent jurisdiction holds that the Rule is
invalid because the Commission exercised its rulemaking authority in a manner
that is beyond the scope and purposes of the Compact, or the powers granted
hereunder, or based upon another applicable standard of review.
B. The Rules of the Commission shall have the force of law in each
Member State, provided however that where the Rules of the Commission
conflict with the laws of the Member State that establish the Member State’s
laws, regulations, and applicable standards that govern the practice of
Social Work as held by a court of competent jurisdiction, the Rules of the
Commission shall be ineffective in that State to the extent of the conflict.
C. The Commission shall exercise its Rulemaking powers pursuant to the
criteria set forth in this Section and the Rules adopted thereunder. Rules
shall become binding on the day following adoption or the date specified in
the rule or amendment, whichever is later.
D. If a majority of the legislatures of the Member States rejects a
Rule or portion of a Rule, by enactment of a statute or resolution in the
same manner used to adopt the Compact within four (4) years of the date of
adoption of the Rule, then such Rule shall have no further force and effect
in any Member State.
E. Rules shall be adopted at a regular or special meeting of the
Commission.
03/07/2025 3:25:10 PM JMB393

HB1712
F. Prior to adoption of a proposed Rule, the Commission shall hold a
public hearing and allow persons to provide oral and written comments, data,
facts, opinions, and arguments.
G. Prior to adoption of a proposed Rule by the Commission, and at
least thirty (30) days in advance of the meeting at which the Commission will
hold a public hearing on the proposed Rule, the Commission shall provide a
Notice of Proposed Rulemaking:
1. On the website of the Commission or other publicly accessible
platform;
2. To persons who have requested notice of the Commission’s
notices of proposed rulemaking; and
3. In such other way(s) as the Commission may by Rule specify.
H. The Notice of Proposed Rulemaking shall include:
1. The time, date, and location of the public hearing at which
the Commission will hear public comments on the proposed Rule and, if
different, the time, date, and location of the meeting where the Commission
will consider and vote on the proposed Rule;
2. If the hearing is held via telecommunication, video
conference, or other electronic means, the Commission shall include the
mechanism for access to the hearing in the Notice of Proposed Rulemaking;
3. The text of the proposed Rule and the reason therefor;
4. A request for comments on the proposed Rule from any
interested person; and
5. The manner in which interested persons may submit written
comments.
I. All hearings will be recorded. A copy of the recording and all
written comments and documents received by the Commission in response to the
proposed Rule shall be available to the public.
J. Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring a separate
hearing on each Rule. Rules may be grouped for the convenience of the
Commission at hearings required by this section.
K. The Commission shall, by majority vote of all members, take final
action on the proposed Rule based on the Rulemaking record and the full text
of the Rule.
1. The Commission may adopt changes to the proposed Rule
provided the changes do not enlarge the original purpose of the proposed
03/07/2025 3:25:10 PM JMB393

HB1712
Rule.
2. The Commission shall provide an explanation of the reasons
for substantive changes made to the proposed Rule as well as reasons for
substantive changes not made that were recommended by commenters.
3. The Commission shall determine a reasonable effective date
for the Rule. Except for an emergency as provided in Section 12.L., the
effective date of the rule shall be no sooner than 30 days after issuing the
notice that it adopted or amended the Rule.
L. Upon determination that an emergency exists, the Commission may
consider and adopt an emergency Rule with 48 hours’ notice, with opportunity
to comment, provided that the usual Rulemaking procedures provided in the
Compact and in this section shall be retroactively applied to the Rule as
soon as reasonably possible, in no event later than ninety (90) days after
the effective date of the Rule. For the purposes of this provision, an
emergency Rule is one that must be adopted immediately in order to:
1. Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or welfare;
2. Prevent a loss of Commission or Member State funds;
3. Meet a deadline for the promulgation of a Rule that is
established by federal law or rule; or
4. Protect public health and safety.
M. The Commission or an authorized committee of the Commission may
direct revisions to a previously adopted Rule for purposes of correcting
typographical errors, errors in format, errors in consistency, or grammatical
errors. Public notice of any revisions shall be posted on the website of the
Commission. The revision shall be subject to challenge by any person for a
period of thirty (30) days after posting. The revision may be challenged only
on grounds that the revision results in a material change to a Rule. A
challenge shall be made in writing and delivered to the Commission prior to
the end of the notice period. If no challenge is made, the revision will take
effect without further action. If the revision is challenged, the revision
may not take effect without the approval of the Commission.
N. No Member State’s rulemaking requirements shall apply under this
Compact.

SECTION 13. OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION, AND ENFORCEMENT
A. Oversight
03/07/2025 3:25:10 PM JMB393

HB1712
1. The executive and judicial branches of State government in
each Member State shall enforce this Compact and take all actions necessary
and appropriate to implement the Compact.
2. Except as otherwise provided in this Compact, venue is proper
and judicial proceedings by or against the Commission shall be brought solely
and exclusively in a court of competent jurisdiction where the principal
office of the Commission is located. The Commission may waive venue and
jurisdictional defenses to the extent it adopts or consents to participate in
alternative dispute resolution proceedings. Nothing herein shall affect or
limit the selection or propriety of venue in any action against a Licensee
for professional malpractice, misconduct or any such similar matter.
3. The Commission shall be entitled to receive service of
process in any proceeding regarding the enforcement or interpretation of the
Compact and shall have standing to intervene in such a proceeding for all
purposes. Failure to provide the Commission service of process shall render a
judgment or order void as to the Commission, this Compact, or promulgated
Rules.
B. Default, Technical Assistance, and Termination
1. If the Commission determines that a Member State has
defaulted in the performance of its obligations or responsibilities under
this Compact or the promulgated Rules, the Commission shall provide written
notice to the defaulting State. The notice of default shall describe the
default, the proposed means of curing the default, and any other action that
the Commission may take, and shall offer training and specific technical
assistance regarding the default.
2. The Commission shall provide a copy of the notice of default
to the other Member States.
C. If a State in default fails to cure the default, the defaulting
State may be terminated from the Compact upon an affirmative vote of a
majority of the delegates of the Member States, and all rights, privileges
and benefits conferred on that State by this Compact may be terminated on the
effective date of termination. A cure of the default does not relieve the
offending State of obligations or liabilities incurred during the period of
default.
D. Termination of membership in the Compact shall be imposed only
after all other means of securing compliance have been exhausted. Notice of
03/07/2025 3:25:10 PM JMB393

HB1712
intent to suspend or terminate shall be given by the Commission to the
governor, the majority and minority leaders of the defaulting State’s
legislature, the defaulting State’s State Licensing Authority and each of the
Member States’ State Licensing Authority.
E. A State that has been terminated is responsible for all
assessments, obligations, and liabilities incurred through the effective date
of termination, including obligations that extend beyond the effective date
of termination.
F. Upon the termination of a State’s membership from this Compact,
that State shall immediately provide notice to all Licensees within that
State of such termination. The terminated State shall continue to recognize
all licenses granted pursuant to this Compact for a minimum of six (6) months
after the date of said notice of termination.
G. The Commission shall not bear any costs related to a State that is
found to be in default or that has been terminated from the Compact, unless
agreed upon in writing between the Commission and the defaulting State.
H. The defaulting State may appeal the action of the Commission by
petitioning the U.S. District Court for the District of Columbia or the
federal district where the Commission has its principal offices. The
prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including
reasonable attorney’s fees.
I. Dispute Resolution
1. Upon request by a Member State, the Commission shall attempt
to resolve disputes related to the Compact that arise among Member States and
between Member and non-Member States.
2. The Commission shall promulgate a Rule providing for both
mediation and binding dispute resolution for disputes as appropriate.
J. Enforcement
1. By majority vote as provided by Rule, the Commission may
initiate legal action against a Member State in default in the United States
District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district where the
Commission has its principal offices to enforce compliance with the
provisions of the Compact and its promulgated Rules. The relief sought may
include both injunctive relief and damages. In the event judicial enforcement
is necessary, the prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such
litigation, including reasonable attorney’s fees. The remedies herein shall
03/07/2025 3:25:10 PM JMB393

HB1712
not be the exclusive remedies of the Commission. The Commission may pursue
any other remedies available under federal or the defaulting Member State’s
law.
2. A Member State may initiate legal action against the
Commission in the U.S. District Court for the District of Columbia or the
federal district where the Commission has its principal offices to enforce
compliance with the provisions of the Compact and its promulgated Rules. The
relief sought may include both injunctive relief and damages. In the event
judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party shall be awarded all
costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney’s fees.
3. No person other than a Member State shall enforce this
Compact against the Commission.

SECTION 14. EFFECTIVE DATE, WITHDRAWAL, AND AMENDMENT
A. The Compact shall come into effect on the date on which the Compact
statute is enacted into law in the seventh Member State.
1. On or after the effective date of the Compact, the Commission
shall convene and review the enactment of each of the first seven Member
States (“Charter Member States”) to determine if the statute enacted by each
such Charter Member State is materially different than the model Compact
statute.
a. A Charter Member State whose enactment is found to be
materially different from the model Compact statute shall be entitled to the
default process set forth in Section 13.
b. If any Member State is later found to be in default, or
is terminated or withdraws from the Compact, the Commission shall remain in
existence and the Compact shall remain in effect even if the number of Member
States should be less than seven.
2. Member States enacting the Compact subsequent to the seven
initial Charter Member States shall be subject to the process set forth in
Section 10.C.21. to determine if their enactments are materially different
from the model Compact statute and whether they qualify for participation in
the Compact.
3. All actions taken for the benefit of the Commission or in
furtherance of the purposes of the administration of the Compact prior to the
effective date of the Compact or the Commission coming into existence shall
03/07/2025 3:25:10 PM JMB393

HB1712
be considered to be actions of the Commission unless specifically repudiated
by the Commission.
4. Any State that joins the Compact subsequent to the
Commission’s initial adoption of the Rules and bylaws shall be subject to the
Rules and bylaws as they exist on the date on which the Compact becomes law
in that State. Any Rule that has been previously adopted by the Commission
shall have the full force and effect of law on the day the Compact becomes
law in that State.
B. Any Member State may withdraw from this Compact by enacting a
statute repealing the same.
1. A Member State’s withdrawal shall not take effect until 180
days after enactment of the repealing statute.
2. Withdrawal shall not affect the continuing requirement of the
withdrawing State’s Licensing Authority to comply with the investigative and
Adverse Action reporting requirements of this Compact prior to the effective
date of withdrawal.
3. Upon the enactment of a statute withdrawing from this
compact, a State shall immediately provide notice of such withdrawal to all
Licensees within that State. Notwithstanding any subsequent statutory
enactment to the contrary, such withdrawing State shall continue to recognize
all licenses granted pursuant to this compact for a minimum of 180 days after
the date of such notice of withdrawal.
C. Nothing contained in this Compact shall be construed to invalidate
or prevent any licensure agreement or other cooperative arrangement between a
Member State and a non-Member State that does not conflict with the
provisions of this Compact.
D. This Compact may be amended by the Member States. No amendment to
this Compact shall become effective and binding upon any Member State until
it is enacted into the laws of all Member States.

SECTION 15. CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY
A. This Compact and the Commission’s rulemaking authority shall be
liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes, and the implementation
and administration of the Compact. Provisions of the Compact expressly
authorizing or requiring the promulgation of Rules shall not be construed to
limit the Commission’s rulemaking authority solely for those purposes.
03/07/2025 3:25:10 PM JMB393

HB1712
B. The provisions of this Compact shall be severable and if any
phrase, clause, sentence or provision of this Compact is held by a court of
competent jurisdiction to be contrary to the constitution of any Member
State, a State seeking participation in the Compact, or of the United States,
or the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person or
circumstance is held to be unconstitutional by a court of competent
jurisdiction, the validity of the remainder of this Compact and the
applicability thereof to any other government, agency, person or circumstance
shall not be affected thereby.
C. Notwithstanding subsection B. of this section, the Commission may
deny a State’s participation in the Compact or, in accordance with the
requirements of Section 13.B., terminate a Member State’s participation in
the Compact, if it determines that a constitutional requirement of a Member
State is a material departure from the Compact. Otherwise, if this Compact
shall be held to be contrary to the constitution of any Member State, the
Compact shall remain in full force and effect as to the remaining Member
States and in full force and effect as to the Member State affected as to all
severable matters.

SECTION 16. CONSISTENT EFFECT AND CONFLICT WITH OTHER STATE LAWS
A. A Licensee providing services in a Remote State under a Multistate
Authorization to Practice shall adhere to the laws and regulations, including
laws, regulations, and applicable standards, of the Remote State where the
client is located at the time care is rendered.
B. Nothing herein shall prevent or inhibit the enforcement of any
other law of a Member State that is not inconsistent with the Compact.
C. Any laws, statutes, regulations, or other legal requirements in a
Member State in conflict with the Compact are superseded to the extent of the
conflict.
D. All permissible agreements between the Commission and the Member
States are binding in accordance with their terms.

17-103-402. Administration of compact.
(a) The Arkansas Social Work Licensing Board is the Social Work
Licensure Compact administrator for this state.
(b) The board may adopt rules that are consistent with the Social Work
03/07/2025 3:25:10 PM JMB393

HB1712
Licensure Compact necessary to implement this subchapter.
(c) The board is not required to adopt the rules of the Social Work
Licensure Compact Commission for those rules to be effective in this state.
(d) For the purposes of the member state's ability to reject a rule
under Section 12(D) of the Social Work Licensure Compact, Arkansas delegates
its authority in this provision to the General Assembly or the Legislative
Council.





























03/07/2025 3:25:10 PM JMB393